Utah statutes.
75-5-304.   Findings -- Limited guardianship preferred -- Order of appointment.

(1)  The court may appoint a guardian as requested if it is satisfied that the person for whom a guardian is sought is incapacitated and that the appointment is necessary or desirable as a means of providing continuing care and supervision of the incapacitated person.

(2)  The court shall prefer a limited guardianship and may only grant a full guardianship if no other alternative exists.  If the court does not grant a limited guardianship, a specific finding shall be made that nothing less than a full guardianship is adequate.

(3)  A guardian appointed by will or written instrument, under Section 75-5-301, whose appointment has not been prevented or nullified under Subsection 75-5-301(4), has priority over any guardian who may be appointed by the court, but the court may proceed with an appointment upon a finding that the testamentary or instrumental guardian has failed to accept the appointment within 30 days after notice of the guardianship proceeding.  Alternatively, the court may dismiss the proceeding or enter any other appropriate order.

